Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Buffer Strip Act:

(1) Buffer strip means a strip of vegetation used to intercept or trap field sediment, organics, pesticides, and other potential pollutants before they reach surface water;

(2) Department means the Department of Agriculture;

(3) District means a natural resources district; and

(4) Person means any individual, partnership, firm, corporation, company, society, or association, the state or any department, agency, or subdivision thereof, or any other public or private entity.

Laws 1998, LB 1126, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 1.